California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(2) Employ a multilingual access coordinator and multilingual access unit to coordinate the department’s multilingual access services, provide technical assistance to department staff, and monitor the provision of multilingual access services.

(j) The department shall engage in regular data collection, monitoring, and oversight of multilingual access unemployment insurance services. The department shall annually report this data to the legislative budget committees.

(k) The provision of unemployment insurance language services shall not
 cause an undue delay in receipt of services or benefits. If the department’s provision of language services unduly delays an individual’s receipt of services or benefits, the individual’s time to meet the department’s deadlines shall be extended for the period of time necessary to receive the language services.

(l) No later than July 1, 2022, the department shall report to the legislative budget and policy committees on the status of multilingual access services to be delivered to individuals participating in the State Disability Insurance and Paid Family Leave programs.

(m) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 78, Sec. 6.   (AB 138)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

317.

The Director of Employment Development shall maintain a field investigating staff, whose function shall embrace investigation throughout the state of violations of this code, to the end that its provisions are more adequately and strictly enforced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 119.)
-------------------------------------------

318.

The Director of Employment Development shall comply with all applicable provisions of the Government Code relating to contracts, budgets and other fiscal matters, including Sections 13320 to 13324, inclusive, of that code, in the same manner and to the same extent as other state agencies, insofar as such provisions are not inconsistent with the provisions of the Social Security Act and the rules and regulations of the Secretary of Labor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 121.)
-------------------------------------------

320.

The Director of Employment Development shall make such reports in such form and containing such information as the Secretary of Labor may from time to time require, and shall comply with such provisions as the secretary may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 124.)
-------------------------------------------

320.3.

(a) The director shall periodically review policies and practices used to determine eligibility for and the amount of benefits in the unemployment insurance program to identify those policies and practices that do all of the following:

(1) Result in delayed eligibility determinations or benefit payments.

(2) Increase workload for the department.

(3) Provide little or no value in identifying or preventing fraud or abuse in the unemployment insurance program.

(b) The director shall report
 to the Legislature the results of the first review on or before July 1, 2015, and may submit subsequent reports thereafter. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 377, Sec. 2.   (AB 1556)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

320.4.

(a) For the purposes of this part, upon appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Report at least once every six months on its internet website all of the following information:

(i) The amount for which it has issued overpayment notices.

(ii) The amount of overpayments waived.

(iii) The amount repaid related to those overpayment notices.

(B) The reports shall encompass benefit payments made by the department from March 1, 2020, until January 12, 2021.

(C) The department shall publish the information required under this paragraph until the repayment period for all the notices has elapsed.

(2) (A) Immediately perform a risk assessment of its deferred workloads, including deferred eligibility determinations and retroactive certifications.

(B) The department’s risk assessment performed under
 subparagraph (A) shall take into account the relative likelihood that it issued payments to ineligible claimants by considering historic overpayment trends, as well as the new or altered eligibility requirements the federal government adopted in response to the COVID-19 pandemic. If necessary, the department shall either partner with another state agency or contract for assistance in performing the analysis in support of this assessment. 

(3) (A) Develop a workload plan that prioritizes its deferred workloads based on the risk assessment performed pursuant to paragraph (2) and determine the staffing and information technology resources needed to accomplish the work within expected timeframes.

(B) Hire and train staff as necessary in order to carry out the workload plan. Using the workload plan, the department shall process the deferred work in alignment with all of the following:

(i) The need to pay timely benefits to new or continued claimants.

(ii) Federal expectations about the urgency of the deferred work.

(iii) Any deadlines by which the department may no longer be allowed to recoup inappropriately paid benefits.

(4) Immediately begin modeling workload projections that account for possible scenarios that would cause a spike in unemployment
 insurance claims. The department shall plan its staffing around the likelihood of those scenarios, including having a contingency plan for less likely scenarios that would have a significant impact on its workload.

(5) By March 1, 2022, revise its public dashboards with regard to the number of backlogged claims in order to clearly describe the difference between those waiting for payment and those that are not, and to clearly indicate the number of claims that have waited longer than 21 days for payment because the department has not yet resolved pending work on the claim.

(6) By June 1, 2022, determine how many of its temporary automation measures for claims processing it can retain and by September 1, 2022, make those a permanent
 feature of its claims processing. 

(7) By June 1, 2022, determine the reasons that claimants cannot successfully complete their identity verification through secure identity verification networked, including ID.me, and work with department vendors to resolve identified problems. The department shall thereafter regularly monitor the rate of successful identity verifications to ensure that it consistently minimizes unnecessary staff intervention.

(8) By June 1, 2022, identify the elements of the department’s Benefit Systems Modernization process that can assist the department in making timely payments and that it can implement incrementally. The department shall then prioritize implementing the elements most likely to
 benefit Californians.

(9) Implement a formal policy per the recession plan, by May 1, 2022, that establishes a process for tracking and periodically analyzing the reasons why unemployment insurance claimants call for assistance.

(10) (A) By May 1, 2022, implement a policy for tracking and monitoring its rate of first-call resolution. The department shall review first-call resolution data at least monthly to evaluate whether it is providing effective assistance to callers.

(B) To maximize the number of calls that department staff are able to answer, as soon as possible, the department shall add prerecorded message functionality to its phone system to advise claimants of their rights and responsibilities after they file their claim with an agent.

(C) To provide a more convenient customer service experience, as soon as possible, the department shall implement features of its phone
 system that allow callers to request a callback from an agent instead of waiting on hold for assistance. 

(11) To prepare to respond to victims of identity theft who receive incorrect tax forms, the department shall, by February 15, 2022, provide information on its internet website and set up a separate email box for those individuals to contact the department and receive prompt resolution.

(12) (A) To the extent consistent with federal law, the department shall immediately obtain from any federally chartered financial institution or other financial institution used by the department to make benefit payments a comprehensive list of claimants’ accounts that are frozen. The department shall immediately thereafter evaluate the list,
 including considering using ID.me to verify claimants’ identities, to identify accounts that should be unfrozen. By March 1, 2022, the department shall direct the institution to take action to freeze or unfreeze accounts as appropriate to ensure that it provides legitimate claimants with benefits but does not pay benefits related to fraudulent claims. 

(B) To ensure that the department reviews each account that an
 institution reports to it as suspicious or potentially fraudulent, by February 2022, the department shall establish a centralized tracking tool that allows it to review and stop payment on claims, as appropriate. The department shall use this tool to monitor its own internal decisions and track whether the claimant responds to its requests for identity information and should, therefore, have their account unfrozen.

(b) Upon
 appropriation by the Legislature, by March 1, 2022, the department shall designate a unit as responsible for coordinating all fraud prevention and detection. The department shall assign that unit sufficient authority to carry out its responsibilities and align the unit’s duties with the Government Operations Agency’s framework for fraud prevention.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 510, Sec. 2.   (AB 56)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

320.5.

The director may by authorized regulations prescribe the information required to be reported to the department by employing units under this division and employers subject to withholding tax under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) in order to make reports required by the Secretary of Labor, to provide information necessary to administer this code, to estimate unemployment rates or to make other estimates required for the purpose of dispensing or withholding money payments under the Welfare Reform Act of 1971, the Employment Security Amendments of 1970, the Emergency Unemployment Compensation Act of 1971, or the Workforce Investment Act of 1998, and to make any other reports or estimates that may be required by any other state or federal law. The authorized regulations of the director may include requirements for the reporting of employment, unemployment, hours, wages, earnings, the location and nature of the industrial, business, or other activity of each establishment for the conduct of business, performance of services, or industrial operations, and such other requirements as are necessary to comply with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

321.

The Director of Employment Development shall make available, upon request, to any agency of the United States government charged with the administration of public works or assistance through public employment, the following information relating to recipients of unemployment compensation:

(a) The recipient’s name.

(b) The recipient’s address.

(c) The ordinary occupation and employment status of each such recipient of unemployment benefits.

(d) A statement of such recipient’s rights to further compensation under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

321.5.

(a) For purposes of preventing payments on fraudulent claims for unemployment compensation benefits, the Director of Employment Development shall verify, with the information provided by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to Section 11105.9 of the Penal Code,
 that the claimant is not an inmate currently incarcerated in the state
 prisons.

(b) The Employment Development Department shall complete necessary system programming or automation upgrades to allow electronic monitoring of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation inmate data to prevent payment on fraudulent claims for unemployment compensation benefits at the earliest possible date, but not later than September 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 511, Sec. 2.   (AB 110)   Effective October 5, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

The department may exchange information with federal, state, or local governmental departments and agencies that are concerned with the administration of unemployment or disability insurance, or the collection of taxes that may be used to finance the administration of unemployment or disability insurance, or the relief of unemployed or destitute individuals, or legislation concerning, regulating, or in any manner affecting the obligations arising out of an employer-employee relation, and with other federal, state, or local departments or agencies of government as the department deems necessary or desirable for the proper administration of this division in accordance with authorized regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 19.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

323.

The Director of Employment Development may apply for an advance to the Unemployment Fund and accept the responsibility for the repayment of such advance in accordance with the conditions specified in Title XII of the Social Security Act, as amended, to secure to this state and its citizens the advantages available under the provisions of that title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

The expense of the administration of this division shall be paid out of the Unemployment Administration Fund, unless otherwise provided for in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

325.

(a) The department may study and make recommendations as to action which might tend to:

(1) Promote the prevention of unemployment and the stabilization of employment.

(2) Encourage and assist in the adoption of practical methods of vocational training, retraining and guidance.

(3) Promote the establishment and operation by governmental units and agencies of reserves for public work to be prosecuted in time of business depression and unemployment.

(4) Promote the reemployment of unemployed workers throughout the state in any way that may seem feasible.

(5) Reduce and prevent unemployment.

(6) Establish the most effective methods of providing economic security through all forms of social insurance.

(b) To accomplish the ends set forth in subdivision (a) of this section, the department may carry on and publish the results of investigations and research studies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

325.5.

The department, in consultation and coordination with veterans’ organizations and veteran service providers, shall do all of the following:

(a) Research the needs of veterans throughout the state and develop a profile of veterans’ employment and training needs.

(b) Develop a statewide plan for the equitable distribution of employment funds for veterans’ employment services.

(c) Seek federal funding for purposes of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 928, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

325.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that state supported Veterans Employment Training services meet the same performance standards as those required by the federal Workforce Investment Act for services provided to veterans.

(b) Following any fiscal year in which state funds support the Veterans Employment Training services program, the Employment Development Department shall provide an annual report to the Legislature, on or before November 1, regarding the following performance measures:

(1) The number of veterans receiving individualized, case managed services.

(2) The number of veterans who receive individualized, case managed services entering employment.

(3) The retention rate for veterans who enter employment.

(4) The average earnings for veterans entering employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 69, Sec. 33.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

The department shall investigate and report upon the degree of unemployment hazard in various industries and occupations and their cost to the Unemployment Fund. It shall recommend to employers in industries or occupations showing an excessive cost to that fund, means for stabilizing employment. It shall also, if necessary, recommend to the Legislature a higher rate of contribution for any classification of industries or occupations in which unemployment is excessive or chronic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

The department is authorized to enter into negotiations with the United States Bureau of the Census to expand the current population survey for a sample of up to 35,000 households in California. The department shall report its findings and the result of the negotiations to the Legislature. At such time as the Bureau of the Census is prepared to undertake the workload involved in expanding California’s portion of the population survey, the department shall submit to the Legislature a budget request for funds not available from other sources to finance a contract with the Bureau of the Census. When sufficient funds are made available through the budget process or from other sources, the department is authorized to contract with the Bureau of the Census for the purpose of expanding the current population survey to a sample of up to 35,000 households in California. Based on the results of the expanded survey, the department shall compile and publish monthly information pertaining to employment and unemployment and shall provide such information to state governmental entities, including the Legislature, which are responsible for preparing state economic projections and revenue estimates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 997.)
-------------------------------------------

329.

(a) The director, or the director’s designee, shall serve as Chairperson of the Joint Enforcement Strike Force on the Underground Economy provided for in Executive Order W-66-93. The strike force shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of the Employment Development Department, the Department of Justice, the Department of Consumer Affairs, the Department of Industrial Relations, the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, the Franchise Tax Board, and the Department of Insurance.

(b) The strike force may invite the following state agencies to serve in an advisory capacity: the California Health and Human Services Agency, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(c) The strike force shall have the following
 duties:

(1) (A) To facilitate and encourage the development and sharing of information by the participating agencies necessary to combat the underground economy including the enforcement activities regarding labor, tax, insurance, and licensing law violators operating in the underground economy. Duly authorized representatives of the strike force employed by an agency listed in subdivision (a) shall exchange intelligence, data, documents, confidential information, or lead referrals pursuant to this section, to the extent permitted by state and federal laws and regulations. 

(B) Any person who is involved or has been involved in the strike force pursuant to this section and at any time has obtained confidential information shall not divulge, or make known in any manner not allowed by law, any of the confidential information received by or reported to members of the strike force. Confidential information authorized to be exchanged pursuant to this section shall retain its confidential status and shall otherwise remain subject to the confidentiality provisions contained in applicable federal and state laws.

(C) Participating agencies may also cooperate and share any appropriate information with the Labor Enforcement Task Force established pursuant to Assembly Bill 1464 of the 2011–12 Regular Session (Chapter 21 of the Statutes of 2012), to the extent related to the underground economy including the enforcement activities regarding labor, tax, insurance,
 and licensing law violators operating in the underground economy permitted by state and federal laws and regulations. Members of the Labor Enforcement Task Force who have obtained confidential information pursuant to this section shall not divulge, or make known in any manner not allowed by law, any of the confidential information received from the strike force.

(2) To improve the coordination of activities among the participating agencies.

(3) To develop methods to pool, focus, and target the enforcement resources of the participating agencies in order to deter tax evasion and maximize recoveries from blatant tax evaders and violators of cash-pay reporting laws.

(4) To reduce enforcement costs wherever possible by eliminating duplicative audits and investigations.

(d) In addition, the strike force shall be empowered to:

(1) Form joint enforcement teams when appropriate to utilize the collective investigative and enforcement capabilities of the participating members.

(2) Establish committees and rules of procedure to carry out the activities of the strike force.

(3) To solicit the cooperation and participation of district attorneys and other state and local agencies in carrying out the objectives of the strike force.

(4) Establish procedures for soliciting referrals from the public, including, but not limited to, an advertised telephone
 hotline.

(5) Develop procedures for improved information sharing among the participating agencies and the Labor Enforcement Task Force, such as shared automated information database systems, the use of a common business identification number, and a centralized debt collection system, to the extent permitted by state and federal laws and regulations.

(6) Develop procedures to permit the participating agencies to use
 civil sanctions.

(7) Provide participating agencies, including the Department of Justice, with investigative leads where collaboration opportunities exist for felony-level criminal investigations, including, but not limited to, referring leads to agencies with appropriate enforcement jurisdiction, and to pursue criminal prosecution when unscrupulous businesses violate the state’s labor, employment, licensing, insurance, and tax laws with respect to the underground economy.

(8) Evaluate, based on its activities, the need for any statutory change to do any of the following:

(A) Eliminate barriers to interagency information sharing.

(B) Improve the ability of the participating agencies to audit, investigate, and prosecute tax and cash-pay violations.

(C) Deter violations and improve voluntary compliance.

(D) Eliminate duplication and improve cooperation among the participating agencies.

(E) Establish shareable information databases.

(F) Establish a common business identification number for use by participating agencies.

(G) Establish centralized, automated debt collection services for the participating agencies.

(e) The strike force shall report to the Governor and the Legislature
 annually during the period of its existence, by June 30, of each year, regarding its activities.

The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of cases of blatant violations and noncompliance with tax and cash-pay laws identified, audited, investigated, or prosecuted through civil action or referred for criminal prosecution.

(2) Actions taken by the strike force to publicize its activities.

(3) Efforts made by the strike force to establish an advertised telephone hotline for receiving referrals from the public.

(4) Procedures for improving information sharing among the agencies represented on the strike force.

(5) Steps taken by the strike force to improve cooperation among participating agencies, reduce duplication of effort, and improve voluntary compliance.

(6) Recommendations for any statutory changes needed to accomplish the goals described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 626, Sec. 2.   (AB 1296)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

331.

(a) The director shall post, on the homepage of the department’s internet website, a hyperlink to information about the Federal Unemployment Tax Act tax credit. On the web page describing this credit, the director shall indicate whether the Unemployment Fund owes money to the federal government, and if so, the implications of that outstanding debt on employers’ unemployment insurance costs.

(b) The director shall update the information posted pursuant to subdivision (a) on the first of each month, as applicable.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.   (AB 1805)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

333.

(a) The department shall place a high priority on the automation of the Benefit Payment Control Program, specifically including, but not limited to, automating the ledger and collection functions.

(b) An automated system for the Benefit Payment Control Program shall include a function which provides for the automatic issuance of monthly collection letters to unemployment insurance claimants who have received benefit overpayments.

(c) Personnel savings from automation of the Benefit Payment Control Program, notwithstanding any other provision of law, shall be redirected to the processing of additional willful overpayment cases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1226, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

334.

The director shall pursue the following methods to increase the collection of unemployment insurance benefit overpayments:

(a) Developing administrative or automated procedures to insure that field offices appropriately refer cases to the central office for the timely interception of a claimant’s state tax refund.

(b) Modifying the automated overpayment detection system so that it will identify more overpayments.

(c) Increasing the number of potential overpayments which are reviewed by the department.

(d) Working with the Legislature and the Governor to adequately staff the Benefit Payment Control Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1226, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

335.

The department, in consultation and coordination with the film and movie industry, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, and the California Film Commission shall do all of the following, contingent upon the appropriation of funds in the annual Budget Act for these specified purposes:

(a) Research and maintain data on the employment and output of the film industry, including full-time, part-time, contract, and short duration or single event employees.

(b) Examine the ethnic diversity and representation of minorities in the entertainment industry.

(c) Determine the overall direct and indirect economic impact of the film industry.

(d) Monitor film industry employment and activity in other states and countries that compete with California for film production.

(e) Review the effect that federal and state laws and local ordinances have on the filmed entertainment industry.

(f) Prepare and release biannually a report to the chairpersons of the appropriate Senate and Assembly policy committees that details the information required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 353, Sec. 125.   (SB 820)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 129 of Ch. 353.)
-------------------------------------------

336.

The director shall establish procedures to identify the transfer or acquisition of a business that is undertaken for purposes of obtaining a lower unemployment insurance contribution rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

339.

(a) The department shall develop and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, implement a recession plan to prepare for an increase in unemployment insurance compensation benefits claims due to an economic recession. The plan shall detail how to respond to economic downturns with a predetermined strategy that has considered the full effect on the department’s operations, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identifying the lessons learned from previous economic downturns, including the coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic.

(2) Identifying the indicators the department will be monitoring and using to project
 the likely upcoming workload impacts.

(3) Identifying the steps the department will take to address increases in its workload, such as cross-training staff, changing its staffing levels, prioritizing specific tasks, and adjusting the way it performs certain work, including addressing all of the following factors:

(A) How quickly staff can be hired.

(B) Whether there is physical space for staff.

(C) Whether the selected location has the technology that will be needed.

(4) Analyzing current job duties or classifications and ensuring the right staff is doing the right work, including all of the following factors:

(A) Whether current staff is ready to take on more complex work, increased volumes of work, or both.

(B) Identification of a backup system for a sudden influx of work.

(C) Assessing how existing seasonal and part-time staff is utilized, including whether the department can temporarily alter the work duties of current staff instead of hiring new staff.

(D) Assessing how current staff can be cross-trained.

(E) Extending hours of operation.

(5) Identifying ways to improve self-serve services to avoid long wait times to speak to staff.

(6) Assessing the current inventory of equipment, including both of the following:

(A) Determining if the department should lease equipment.

(B) Determining if there is enough equipment to support anticipated increased staffing levels.

(7) Identifying the altered policies or procedures that the department would activate if a rise in unemployment insurance compensation benefits claims became significant enough to warrant that step.

(8) Analyzing communications, including determining if additional lines of communication are needed, such as additional phone lines, additional email boxes, and external
 communications, including, but not limited to, social media.

(9) Identifying budget and funding constraints.

(10) Enhancing claims processing tools to ensure that the department’s identity verification processes are as robust as possible.

(11) Assessing call center protocols by doing both of the following:

(A) Establishing a process for tracking and periodically analyzing the reasons why unemployment insurance compensation benefits claimants call for assistance.

(B) Analyzing the data gathered to improve the department’s call center by doing both of the following:

(i) Identifying and resolving weaknesses or problems with the ways in which the department assists unemployment insurance compensation benefits claimants through self-serve services and non-call center options.

(ii) Developing specialized training modules to quickly train call center staff on the most commonly requested items with which callers want assistance.

(12) Summarizing actions taken by the department to implement recommendations contained in the recession plan previously submitted in accordance with subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The department shall provide a copy of the recession plan to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, and the Department of Finance by March 1, 2022, and update the recession plan and provide a copy to the
 Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, and the Department of Finance every second year thereafter.

(2) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 119, Sec. 1.   (AB 2129)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

339.5.

(a) The department shall conduct a feasibility study that examines the idea of extending unemployment insurance benefits to self-employed individuals and reports on what actions are necessary to implement the expansion.

(b) The feasibility study shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The feasibility of including self-employed individuals in the existing unemployment insurance structure.

(2) The type of financing structure that would be appropriate for self-employed individuals.

(3) The benefit determination structure that would be
 appropriate for self-employed individuals.

(4) Fraud mitigation considerations.

(5) Documentation and tracking necessities.

(c) By December 1, 2023, the department shall complete and submit the feasibility study to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 836, Sec. 1.   (SB 1138)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

340.

(a) (1) The department shall provide a plan for assessing the effectiveness of its fraud prevention and detection tools by May 1, 2022, to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee.

(2) The department shall provide a report with an update on its progress on performing the assessment that the plan identified pursuant to paragraph (1) by July 1, 2022, to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and
 the Joint Legislative Audit Committee.

(b) On or before January 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department shall analyze and assess the effectiveness of its fraud prevention and detection tools and shall submit this analysis and assessment to the Senate Committee on Labor, Public Employment and Retirement, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, and the Joint Legislative Audit Committee. Details on fraud methods and tools may be generalized, excluded, or redacted to protect the fraud deterrence practices of the department.

(c) The plan, assessments, and reports required by this section shall be provided consistent with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 78, Sec. 7.   (AB 138)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board [401. - 413.]

401.

(a) There is in the department an Appeals Division consisting of the California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board and its employees. The appeals board consists of five members. Three members shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to the approval of the Senate. One member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, and one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. All of the members of the appeals board shall be attorneys at law admitted to practice in any state of the United States, and shall have, at a minimum, one year of experience in conducting judicial or administrative hearings or five years of experience in the practice of law. Each member of the board shall devote his or her full time to the performance of
 his or her duties. The chairperson and each member of the board shall receive the annual salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The Governor shall designate the chairperson of the appeals board from the membership of the appeals board. The person so designated shall hold the office of chairperson at the pleasure of the Governor. The chairperson shall designate a member of the appeals board to act as chairperson in his or her absence.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to appointments made on or after January 1, 2013.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the two California Unemployment Insurance Appeals Board member positions that are eliminated pursuant to this act be those board member positions that could have been appointed by the
 Governor, but were not, and that are currently vacant and have been vacant since October 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 136.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

Each member of the appeals board shall serve for a term of four years and until his successor is appointed and qualifies. The term of office of each member of the board appointed pursuant to the 1967 amendment to this section shall also be for four years; provided, however, that of the two board members first appointed pursuant to such amendments, one shall be appointed for a term which shall expire July 1, 1970, and one for a term which shall expire July 1, 1971.

A vacancy shall be filled by the appointing power by appointment for the unexpired term. A vacancy filled by the Governor shall be subject to the approval of the Senate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1225, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

All personnel of the Appeals Division shall be appointed, directed and controlled only by the appeals board or its authorized deputies or agents to whom it may delegate such powers.

The appeals board shall prepare a budget covering the necessary administrative costs of the Appeals Division. Such budget shall not be subject to change by the director except as agreed to by the appeals board. In the event that agreement cannot be reached, the final decision shall rest with the Governor. The director shall furnish the equipment, supplies, housing and nonpersonal and housekeeping services required by the Appeals Division and shall perform such other mechanics of administration as the appeals board and the director may agree upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1586.)
-------------------------------------------

404.
